Illinois, session 104th, SB3785.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Sections 210 and 210.5 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/210)7    Sec. 210. Dependent care assistance program tax credit. 8    (a) Beginning with tax years ending on or after June 30, 91995, each taxpayer who is primarily engaged in manufacturing 10is entitled to a credit against the tax imposed by subsections 11(a) and (b) of Section 201 in an amount equal to 5% of the 12amount of expenditures by the taxpayer in the tax year for 13which the credit is claimed, reported pursuant to Section 14129(d)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code, to provide in the 15Illinois premises of the taxpayer's workplace an on-site 16facility dependent care assistance program under Section 129 17of the Internal Revenue Code.18    (b) If the amount of credit exceeds the tax liability for 19the year, the excess may be carried forward and applied to the 20tax liability of the 2 taxable years following the excess 21credit year. The credit shall be applied to the earliest year 22for which there is a tax liability. If there are credits from 23more than one tax year that are available to offset a   SB3785- 2 -LRB104 19609 HLH 33058 b1liability, the earlier credit shall be applied first.2    (c) A taxpayer claiming the credit provided by this 3Section shall maintain and record such information as the 4Department may require by regulation regarding the dependent 5care assistance program for which credit is claimed. When 6claiming the credit provided by this Section, the taxpayer 7shall provide such information regarding the taxpayer's 8provision of a dependent care assistance program under Section 9129 of the Internal Revenue Code.10    (d) If a taxpayer claims a credit under this Section for a 11taxable year, then the taxpayer may not also claim a credit 12under Section 210.5 for the same taxable year. 13(Source: P.A. 88-505.) 14    (35 ILCS 5/210.5)15    Sec. 210.5. Tax credit for employee child care. 16    (a) Each corporate taxpayer is entitled to a credit 17against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 18201 as provided in this Section. For taxable years ending on or 19after December 31, 2000 and on or before December 31, 2004, the 20amount of the credit shall be equal to: (1) 30% of the start-up 21costs expended by the corporate taxpayer to provide a child 22care facility for the children of its employees; and (2) 5% of 23the annual amount paid by the corporate taxpayer in providing 24the child care facility for the children of its employees. For 25taxable years ending after December 31, 2004 and prior to   SB3785- 3 -LRB104 19609 HLH 33058 b1December 31, 2007, the amount of the credit shall be equal to 25% of the annual amount paid by the corporate taxpayer in 3providing the child care facility for the children of its 4employees. For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 52007 and before December 31, 2026, the amount of the credit 6shall be equal to: (1) 30% of the start-up costs expended by 7the corporate taxpayer to provide a child care facility for 8the children of its employees; and (2) 5% of the annual amount 9paid by the corporate taxpayer in providing the child care 10facility for the children of its employees. For taxable years 11ending on or after December 31, 2026, the amount of the credit 12shall be equal to: (1) 50% of the start-up costs expended by 13the corporate taxpayer to provide a child care facility for 14the children of its employees; and (2) 20% of the annual amount 15paid by the corporate taxpayer to (i) provide an on-site child 16care facility for the children of its employees, (ii) provide 17child care offsite for the children of its employees, or (iii) 18a combination of (i) and (ii). This amendatory Act of the 104th 19General Assembly is not intended to make any substantive 20changes with respect to taxable years ending prior to December 2131, 2026. in an amount equal to (i) for taxable years ending on 22or after December 31, 2000 and on or before December 31, 2004 23and for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2007, 30% 24of the start-up costs expended by the corporate taxpayer to 25provide a child care facility for the children of its 26employees and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after   SB3785- 4 -LRB104 19609 HLH 33058 b1December 31, 2000, 5% of the annual amount paid by the 2corporate taxpayer in providing the child care facility for 3the children of its employees. The provisions of Section 250 4do not apply to the credits allowed under this Section. If the 55% credit authorized under item (ii) of this Section 6subsection is claimed, the 5% credit authorized under Section 7210 cannot also be claimed.8    To receive the tax credit under this Section a corporate 9taxpayer may do one or more of the following: it may either 10independently provide and operate a child care facility for 11the children of its employees; or it may join in a partnership 12with one or more other corporations to jointly provide and 13operate a child care facility for the children of employees of 14the corporations in the partnership; or it may coordinate with 15an independent child care facility to provide care for the 16children of employees.17    (b) The tax credit may not reduce the taxpayer's liability 18to less than zero. If the amount of the tax credit exceeds the 19tax liability for the year, the excess may be carried forward 20and applied to the tax liability of the 5 taxable years 21following the excess credit year. The credit must be applied 22to the earliest year for which there is a tax liability. If 23there are credits from more than one tax year that are 24available to offset a liability, then the earlier credit must 25be applied first.26    (c) As used in this Section, "start-up costs" means   SB3785- 5 -LRB104 19609 HLH 33058 b1planning, site-preparation, construction, renovation, or 2acquisition of a child care facility. As used in this Section, 3"child care facility" is limited to a child care facility 4located in Illinois.5    (d) A corporate taxpayer claiming the credit provided by 6this Section shall maintain and record such information as the 7Department may require by rule regarding the child care 8facility for which the credit is claimed.9(Source: P.A. 95-648, eff. 10-11-07.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.